Wyoming statutes. Title 37 Public Utilities
Article 2. Rights-Of-Way

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to eminent domain, see §§

1-26-501

through

1-26-817

.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Railroad's duty to children walking longitudinally along railroad tracks or right-of-way, 31 ALR2d 789.

Rights, as between private parties, as to relocation of railroad rights-of-way, 80 ALR2d 743.

What constitutes abandonment of a railroad right-of-way, 95 ALR2d 468.

Adverse possession of railroad's right-of-way by another, 95 ALR2d 468.

§ 37-9-201.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1981, ch. 174, § 3.

Cross references. —

For provisions relating to rights of way of a railroad corporation, see §

1-26-810

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1890-91, ch. 39, § 1, related to railroad right-of-ways.

§ 37-9-202.
[Renumbered.]

Renumbered as

37-9-311

by Laws 2001, ch. 200, § 3.

§ 37-9-203.
Lands heretofore taken may be acquired.

Any railroad company which may have prior to January ninth, A.D. 1891, taken any of the lands of this state for right-of-way and depot grounds shall, upon filing a plat and survey thereof, with the director, and payment for depot grounds, be entitled to a conveyance by letters patent, by the governor, conveying in fee the lands for depot grounds, and granting forever to such railroad company, its successors and assigns, the right to take, use, occupy and enjoy for its railroad purposes, the lands so taken for right-of-way, for tracks and roadways; provided, that in addition to the filing of such survey and plat, proof, to the satisfaction of the land commissioners, shall be made of the construction of such railroad across the land, and the erection of a station on the lands claimed for depot grounds.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 39, § 2; R.S. 1899, § 3208; C.S. 1910, § 4201; C.S. 1920, § 5372; R.S. 1931, § 96-108; C.S. 1945, § 65-202; W.S. 1957, § 37-203; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

This section as enacted provided for the filing of plats and surveys with the secretary of state. Prior compilers changed “secretary of state” to read “commissioner of public lands.” For section providing for filing with director of state lands and investments rather than with secretary of state, see §

37-9-205

.

Cited

in

United States v. Fuller, 20 F. Supp. 839, 1937 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1481 (D. Idaho 1937).

§ 37-9-204.
Rights-of-way for oil and gas companies.

W.S.

37-9-202

and

37-9-203

shall also apply to all gas and petroleum oil corporations, companies and individuals, for the right-of-way ten (10) feet wide, through the school and other lands, over which the state has control, for the purpose of carrying gas or oil through pipes, also land for pump stations, tanks, and other buildings, necessary to conduct the oil or gas product of the wells of Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1890-91, ch. 39, § 3; R.S. 1899, § 3209; C.S. 1910, § 4202; C.S. 1920, § 5373; Laws 1921, ch. 115, § 1; R.S. 1931, § 96-109; C.S. 1945, § 65-203; W.S. 1957, § 37-204; 2012, ch. 84, § 201.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, substituted “W.S.

37-9-202

and

37-9-203

” for “The last two (2) preceding sections.”

Editor's notes. —

“The last two (2) preceding sections” apparently refers to the last two preceding sections of Laws 1890-91, ch. 39, which would be §§

37-9-201

and

37-9-203

.Section

37-9-201

was repealed by Laws 1981.

Cited

in

United States v. Fuller, 20 F. Supp. 839, 1937 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 1481 (D. Idaho 1937).

§ 37-9-205.
Plats of survey to be filed.

The secretary of state is hereby authorized to transfer to the office of the director all plats of survey which may have been filed in the office of the secretary of state under the provisions of W.S.

37-9-203

and

37-9-204

, and from and after the passage of this section all plats of survey required to be filed under the provisions of the sections aforesaid shall be filed with the director instead of with the secretary of state.

History.

Laws 1915, ch. 84, § 1; C.S. 1920, § 5374; R.S. 1931, § 96-110; C.S. 1945, § 65-204; W.S. 1957, § 37-205; Laws 1992, ch. 55, § 3; 2012, ch. 98, § 1.

The 2012 amendment,

deleted “37-9-201” preceding “37-9-203.”

Laws 2012, ch. 98 § 4, makes
the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2012.

Editor's notes. —

Section

37-9-201

, referred to in this section, was repealed in 1981.